Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.904

Implementation—1994 c 237.

The director of licensing, beginning July 1, 1995, may take such steps as are necessary to ensure that this act is implemented on its *effective date[s].

[ 1994 c 237 s 35.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1994 c 237 has different effective dates. The effective date for sections 1 through 29 is January 1, 1996, and the effective date for the remainder of the act is June 9, 1994.